Idaho, session 2026, S1299.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2364, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2364. LIMITATIONS ON DIGITAL IDENTIFICATION. (1) As used in this
section:
(a) "Digital identification" means an electronic credential issued by
a public entity and stored or displayed on a personal electronic device
to establish a person's identity, age, or legal status.
(b) "Public entity" means the state of Idaho or any agency, department,
board, commission, institution, political subdivision, or contractor
acting on behalf of the state.
(2)(a) A public entity shall not require any person to obtain, main-
tain, present, or use digital identification.
(b) A public entity shall not deny, delay, condition, or reduce any
service, benefit, license, employment, education, or access based on a
person's refusal or inability to use digital identification.
(c) Physical, non-digital identification authorized under Idaho law
shall remain valid for all governmental purposes.
(3)(a) A public entity shall not require a person to surrender, unlock,
or relinquish control of a personal electronic device for identity ver-
ification.
(b) Presentation of digital identification shall not constitute con-
sent to search or access any other contents of a device.
(4)(a) Digital identification may be used only for immediate identity
verification.
(b) A public entity shall not track individuals, retain identity data
beyond a transaction, or use digital identification as a universal or
shared credential across agencies.
(5)(a) The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce the
provisions of this section. Before filing an action for injunctive re-
lief, the attorney general shall provide written notice of the alleged
violation and allow the public entity fifteen (15) days to cure the vi-
olation.


(b) If the violation is not cured within fifteen (15) days, the attorney
general may bring an action in district court to enjoin the public en-
tity from violating the provisions of this section.
(6) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring an ac-
tion in district court for declaratory or injunctive relief.
(7) A court issuing an order pursuant to this section may enforce such
order through the court's contempt authority as provided by law.
(8) A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this sec-
tion shall be entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(9) No public employee shall be personally liable for actions taken
within the employee's scope of employment.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.